Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 51

State Board of Equalization

4-3-5101. Members — Appointment — Terms.

The state board of equalization shall consist of:

The governor or one (1) individual appointed by the governor whose name shall be filed with the secretary of state and who shall sit on the board for the governor in the governor's absence as a voting member of the board;

The treasurer;

The secretary of state;

The comptroller of the treasury;

The commissioner of revenue;

One (1) person named by the governor who has knowledge of and experience in tax assessments at the city level; and

One (1) person named by the governor who has knowledge of and experience in tax assessments at the county level.

Each appointment by the governor to fill the positions created by subdivisions (a)(6) and (7) shall be for a tenure or term of four (4) years, for each of the two (2) members who are not serving ex officio to be staggered with that of the other.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 25; Shan. Supp., § 373a66; Code 1932, § 290; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(14); 1937, ch. 33, § 52; 1939, ch. 11, § 33; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.52 (Williams, § 255.55); Acts 1957, ch. 228, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 4, 14; impl. am., Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 4; Acts 1974, ch. 771, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-307.

Compiler's Notes. The state board of equalization, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

4-3-5102. Chair and vice chair.

The governor shall be chair of the board.

At the meeting of the board on the second Monday in August of each year, the board shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as vice chair for one (1) year who shall preside at all meetings in the absence of the governor.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 52; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.52 (Williams, § 255.55); Acts 1957, ch. 228, § 1; 1974, ch. 771, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-307.

4-3-5103. Powers and duties of board.

The state board of equalization has the following duties and functions to:

Promulgate and publish an assessment manual or manuals for the appraisal, classification and assessment of property for use by local assessors of property in making their assessments of particular classes and parcels of property, including the assessment of the various kinds of personal property owned and used by corporations, partnerships and individuals engaged in business and professions for profit;

Effect the assessment of all property in the state in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee and all statutory provisions. The state board shall exercise powers conferred upon it by law to the end that assessments in every taxing jurisdiction may be in accordance with the law;

Prescribe educational and training courses for state and local assessing officials and issue certificates to such officials who successfully complete the training and requirements prescribed by the state board;

Receive, hear, consider and act upon complaints and appeals made to the board regarding the valuation, classification and assessment of property in the state;

Hear and determine complaints and appeals made to the board concerning exemption of property from taxation;

Review assessments made by the comptroller of the treasury;

Promulgate all necessary rules, regulations and procedures for implementation of tax relief to elderly low income taxpayers, homeowners totally and permanently disabled and disabled veterans, and make an annual summary of their findings available to members of the general assembly upon request; and

Carry out such other duties as may be required by law.

Acts 1974, ch. 771, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-307; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 64; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Cross-References. Powers and duties of board, title 67, ch. 1, part 3.

Tax law generally, title 67.

Law Reviews.

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

4-3-5104. Executive secretary — Appointment.

The state board of equalization shall appoint an executive secretary, who shall be a person qualified by training and experience to assist the board and to perform the duties of this office.

The board shall fix the salary of the executive secretary, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

Acts 1957, ch. 228, § 1; 1974, ch. 771, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-307.

4-3-5105. Powers and duties of executive secretary.

Under the direction of the state board of equalization, the executive secretary has the power and duty to:

Keep written minutes of all meetings of the state board setting forth all actions of the state board, which shall be open to public inspection during regular office hours;

Conduct preliminary hearings and make investigations for the state board regarding any appeals before the board from assessments of property, other than assessments made by the comptroller of the treasury;

Obtain evidence, information and statistics relative to the value, classification and assessment of property for assistance to the state board in its duties of equalization;

Require assessors of property to furnish reports under oath, giving specific information relating to assessments and other facts concerning properties and such other information as may be required by the state board;

Prepare an annual report, approved by the state board, which shall be made available to the general assembly with an appropriate summary of information regarding assessments of property in each county of the state;

Conduct such studies of the relationship between existing assessments and the value as set out in § 67-5-603 of such property or classes of property as may be directed by the state board;

Study and investigate the tax laws of other states and policies of federal and state agencies relating to assessments of property;

Approve applications for exemption from property taxation, subject to review by the state board;

Give assistance to local boards of equalization on matters affecting the equalization of assessments and the interpretation of laws relating to assessment, classification and valuation of property; and

Carry out all policies, rules and regulations that are adopted by the state board.

Acts 1957, ch. 228, § 1; 1974, ch. 771, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-307; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 65; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-3-5106. Employment of personnel.

The executive secretary may employ such personnel as are approved by the state board, either part time or full time, to assist in carrying out §§4-3-5102 —4-3-5105 and any other provisions required of the executive secretary by law.

Acts 1957, ch. 228, § 1; 1974, ch. 771, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-307.